Illinois, session 104th, HB4675.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Humane Care for Animals Act is amended by 5changing Section 3.04 as follows: 6    (510 ILCS 70/3.04)7    Sec. 3.04. Arrests and seizures; penalties. 8    (a) Any law enforcement officer making an arrest for an 9offense involving one or more companion animals under Section 103.01, 3.02, 3.03, 3.03-1, 4.01, 4.03, 4.04, 6, 7.1, or 7.15 of 11this Act may lawfully take possession of some or all of the 12companion animals in the possession of the person arrested. 13The officer, after taking possession of the companion animals, 14must file with the court before whom the complaint is made 15against any person so arrested an affidavit stating the name 16of the person charged in the complaint, a description of the 17condition of the companion animal or companion animals taken, 18and the time and place the companion animal or companion 19animals were taken, together with the name of the person from 20whom the companion animal or companion animals were taken and 21name of the person who claims to own the companion animal or 22companion animals if different from the person from whom the 23companion animal or companion animals were seized. He or she   HB4675- 2 -LRB104 17397 WRO 30822 b1must at the same time deliver an inventory of the companion 2animal or companion animals taken to the court of competent 3jurisdiction. The officer must place the companion animal or 4companion animals in the custody of an animal control or 5animal shelter and the agency must retain custody of the 6companion animal or companion animals subject to an order of 7the court adjudicating the charges on the merits and before 8which the person complained against is required to appear for 9trial. If the animal control or animal shelter owns no 10facility capable of housing the companion animals, has no 11space to house the companion animals, or is otherwise unable 12to house the companion animals or the health or condition of 13the animals prevents their removal, the animals shall be 14impounded at the site of the violation pursuant to a court 15order authorizing the impoundment, provided that the person 16charged is an owner of the property. Employees or agents of the 17animal control or animal shelter or law enforcement shall have 18the authority to access the on-site impoundment property for 19the limited purpose of providing care and veterinary treatment 20for the impounded animals and ensuring their well-being and 21safety. Upon impoundment, a petition for posting of security 22may be filed under Section 3.05 of this Act. Disposition of the 23animals shall be controlled by Section 3.06 of this Act. The 24State's Attorney may, within 14 days after the seizure, file a 25"petition for forfeiture prior to trial" before the court 26having criminal jurisdiction over the alleged charges, asking   HB4675- 3 -LRB104 17397 WRO 30822 b1for permanent forfeiture of the companion animals seized. The 2petition shall be filed with the court, with copies served on 3the impounding agency, the owner, and anyone claiming an 4interest in the animals. In a "petition for forfeiture prior 5to trial", the burden is on the prosecution to prove by a 6preponderance of the evidence that the person arrested 7violated Section 3.01, 3.02, 3.03, 3.03-1, 4.01, 4.03, 4.04, 86, 7.1, or 7.15 of this Act or Section 26-5 or 48-1 of the 9Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012. Upon 10receipt of a petition under this subsection, the court shall 11set a hearing on the petition. The hearing shall be conducted 12within 14 days after the filing of the petition, or as soon as 13practicable, but not more than 45 days after the filing of the 14petition. 15    (b) An owner whose companion animal or companion animals 16are removed by a law enforcement officer under this Section 17must be given written notice of the circumstances of the 18removal and of any legal remedies available to him or her. The 19notice must be delivered in person, posted at the place of 20seizure, or delivered to a person residing at the place of 21seizure or, if the address of the owner is different from the 22address of the person from whom the companion animal or 23companion animals were seized, delivered by registered mail to 24his or her last known address.25    (c) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, upon 26conviction of or being placed on supervision for violating   HB4675- 4 -LRB104 17397 WRO 30822 b1Sections 3, 3.01, 3.02, 3.03, 3.03-1, 4.01, 4.03, 4.04, 6, 27.1, or 7.15 of this Act or Section 26-5 or 48-1 of the 3Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012, the court 4may order the person convicted or placed on supervision to 5forfeit to an animal control or animal shelter the animal or 6animals that are the basis of the conviction or order for 7supervision. Upon an order of forfeiture, the person convicted 8or placed on supervision is deemed to have permanently 9relinquished all rights to the animal or animals that are the 10basis of the conviction or order for supervision, if not 11already. The forfeited animal or animals shall be adopted or 12humanely euthanized. In no event may the person convicted or 13placed on supervision, or anyone residing in his or her 14household be permitted to adopt or otherwise possess the 15forfeited animal or animals. The court, additionally, may 16order that the person convicted or placed on supervision, and 17persons dwelling in the same household as the person convicted 18or placed on supervision who conspired, aided, or abetted in 19the unlawful act that was the basis of the conviction or order 20for supervision, or who knew or should have known of the 21unlawful act, may not own, possess, harbor, or have custody or 22control of any other animals for a period of time that the 23court deems reasonable, up to and including permanent 24relinquishment. 25    (d) In addition to any other penalty, the court may order 26that a person and persons dwelling in the same household may   HB4675- 5 -LRB104 17397 WRO 30822 b1not own, harbor, or have custody or control of any other animal 2if the person has been convicted of 2 or more of the following 3offenses: 4        (1) a violation of Section 3.02 of this Act; 5        (2) a violation of Section 4.01 of this Act; or6        (3) a violation of Section 48-1 of the Criminal Code 7    of 2012. 8    (e) A person who violates the prohibition against owning, 9possessing, harboring, having custody, or having control of 10animals is subject to immediate forfeiture of any animal 11illegally owned in violation of subsection (c). A person who 12owns, possesses, harbors, has custody, or has control of an 13animal in violation of an order issued under subsection (c) is 14also subject to the civil and criminal contempt power of the 15court and, if found guilty of criminal contempt, may be 16subject to imprisonment for not more than 90 days, a fine of 17not more than $2,500, or both. 18(Source: P.A. 102-114, eff. 1-1-22; 103-490, eff. 8-4-23.)